Nebraska, session 109, LB9.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 28-1418.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1418.01 For purposes of sections 28-1418 to 28-1429.07:
(1) Alternative nicotine product means any noncombustible product
containing nicotine or a nicotine analogue that is intended for human
consumption, whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or ingested by any other
means. Alternative nicotine product does not include any electronic nicotine
delivery system, cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco product, or any product
regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration
under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(2) Cigarette means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be
burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of or contains
(a) any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing
tobacco, (b) tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product which,
because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its
packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers
as a cigarette, or (c) any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing
tobacco which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the
filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased
by, consumers as a cigarette described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section;
(3) Delivery sale means to sell, give, or furnish products (a) by mail or
delivery service, (b) through the Internet or a computer network, (c) by
telephone, or (d) through any other electronic method;
(4)(a) Electronic nicotine delivery system means any product or device
containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives that
employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other
electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, to
simulate smoking by delivering the nicotine, nicotine analogue, tobacco, or
tobacco derivatives in vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol form to a person
inhaling from the product or device.
(b) Electronic nicotine delivery system includes, but is not limited to,
the following:
(i) Any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or
tobacco derivatives, whether sold separately or sold in combination with a
product or device that is intended to deliver to a person nicotine, nicotine
analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol
form;
(ii) Any product or device marketed, manufactured, distributed, or sold as
an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic
pipe, electronic hookah, or similar products, names, descriptors, or devices;
and
(iii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device that
is used during operation of the product or device when sold in combination with
any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco
derivatives.
(c) Electronic nicotine delivery system does not include the following:
(i) An alternative nicotine product, cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco
product, or any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food
and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act; or
(ii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device that is
used during operation of the product or device when not sold in combination
with any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or
tobacco derivatives;
(5) Nicotine analogue means a substance that has:
(a) A chemical structure substantially similar to nicotine; or
-1-

LB9 LB9
2025 2025
(b) An effect on the central nervous system that is substantially similar
to, or greater than, the effect on the central nervous system of nicotine;
(6) (5) Self-service display means a retail display that contains a
tobacco product, a tobacco-derived product, an electronic nicotine delivery
system, or an alternative nicotine product and is located in an area openly
accessible to a retailer's customers and from which such customers can readily
access the product without the assistance of a salesperson. Self-service
display does not include a display case that holds tobacco products, tobacco-
derived products, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine
products behind locked doors; and
(7) (6) Tobacco specialty store means a retail store that (a) derives at
least seventy-five percent of its revenue from tobacco products, tobacco-
derived products, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine
products and (b) does not permit persons under the age of twenty-one years to
enter the premises unless accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.
Sec. 2. Section 59-1523, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
59-1523 (1) The cigarette tax division of the Tax Commissioner may, after
notice and hearing, revoke or suspend for any violation of section 59-1520 the:
(a) License or licenses of any person licensed under sections 28-1418 to
28-1429.07 or sections 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act; or
(b) License or certification of any person licensed or certified under the
Tobacco Products Tax Act.
(2) Cigarettes that are acquired, held, owned, possessed, transported,
sold, or distributed in or imported into this state in violation of section
59-1520 are declared to be contraband goods and are subject to seizure and
forfeiture. Any cigarettes so seized and forfeited shall be destroyed. Such
cigarettes shall be declared to be contraband goods whether the violation of
section 59-1520 is knowing or otherwise.
Sec. 3. Section 69-2705, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
69-2705 For purposes of sections 69-2704 to 69-2711:
(1) Brand family means all styles of cigarettes sold under the same
trademark and differentiated from one another by means of additional modifiers
or descriptors, including, but not limited to, menthol, lights, kings, and
100s, and includes any brand name, alone or in conjunction with any other word,
trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling message, or recognizable pattern of
colors, or any other indicia of product identification identical or similar to,
or identifiable with, a previously known brand of cigarettes;
(2) Cigarette has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;
(3) Cigarette inputs means any machinery or other component parts
typically used in the manufacture of cigarettes, including, without limitation,
tobacco whether processed or unprocessed, cigarette papers and tubes, cigarette
filters or any component parts intended for use in the making of cigarette
filters, and any machinery typically used in the making of cigarettes;
(4) Days has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;
(5) Directory means the directory compiled by the Tax Commissioner under
section 69-2706 or, in the case of references to another state's directory, the
directory compiled under the similar law in that other state;
(6) Importer has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;
(7) Indian country has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;
(8) Indian tribe has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;
(9) Master Settlement Agreement has the same meaning as in section
69-2702;
(10) Nonparticipating manufacturer means any tobacco product manufacturer
that is not a participating manufacturer;
(11) Nonparticipating manufacturer cigarettes means cigarettes (a) of a
brand family that is not included in the certification of a participating
manufacturer under subsection (1) of section 69-2706, (b) that are subject to
the escrow requirement under subdivision (2) of section 69-2703 because the
participating manufacturer in whose certification the brand family is included
is not generally performing its financial obligations under the Master
Settlement Agreement, or (c) of a brand family of a participating manufacturer
that is not otherwise listed on the directory under subsection (2) of section
69-2706;
(12) Package means any pack or other container on which a state stamp or
tribal stamp could be applied consistent with and as required by sections
69-2701 to 69-2711 and 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act that
contains one or more individual cigarettes for sale. Nothing in such sections
shall alter any other applicable requirement with respect to the minimum number
of cigarettes that may be contained in a pack or other container of cigarettes.
References to package do not include a container of multiple packages;
(13) Participating manufacturer has the same meaning as in section II(jj)
of the Master Settlement Agreement;
(14) Person means any natural person, trustee, company, partnership,
corporation, or other legal entity, including any Indian tribe or
instrumentality thereof;
(15) Purchase means any acquisition in any manner or by any means for any
consideration. The term includes transporting or receiving product in
connection with a purchase;
(16) Qualified escrow fund has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;
(17) Retailer includes retail dealers as defined in section 77-2601 or
anyone who is licensed under sections 28-1420 to 28-1422;
-2-

LB9 LB9
2025 2025
(18) Sale or sell means any transfer, exchange, or barter in any manner or
by any means for any consideration. Sale or sell includes distributing or
shipping product in connection with a sale;
(19) Shortfall amount means the difference between (a) the full amount of
the deposit required to be made by a nonparticipating manufacturer for a
calendar quarter under section 69-2703 and (b) the sum of (i) any amounts
precollected by a stamping agent and deposited into escrow for that calendar
quarter on behalf of the nonparticipating manufacturer under section
69-2708.01, (ii) the amount deposited into escrow by the nonparticipating
manufacturer for that calendar quarter under section 69-2703, (iii) any amounts
deposited into escrow for that calendar quarter under subdivision (2)(d) of
section 69-2703 by an importer on such nonparticipating manufacturer's
cigarettes, and (iv) any amounts collected by the state for that calendar
quarter under the bond posted by the nonparticipating manufacturer under
section 69-2707.01. The shortfall amount, if any, for a nonparticipating
manufacturer for a calendar quarter shall be calculated by the Attorney General
within fifteen days following the date on which the state determines the amount
it will collect on the bond posted by the nonparticipating manufacturer as
provided in section 69-2707.01;
(20) Stamping agent means a person that is authorized to affix stamps to
packages or other containers of cigarettes under section 77-2603 or 77-2603.01
or any person that is required to pay the tobacco tax imposed pursuant to
section 77-4008 on roll-your-own cigarettes;
(21) Tax Commissioner means the Tax Commissioner of the State of Nebraska;
(22) Tobacco product manufacturer has the same meaning as in section
69-2702;
(23) Units sold has the same meaning as in section 69-2702; and
(24) Unstamped cigarettes means any cigarettes that are not contained in a
package bearing a stamp required under section 77-2603 or 77-2603.01.
Sec. 4. Section 69-2709, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
69-2709 (1) In addition to or in lieu of any other civil or criminal
remedy provided by law, upon a determination that a stamping agent has violated
subsection (4) of section 69-2706 or any rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated pursuant thereto, the Tax Commissioner may revoke or suspend the
license of any stamping agent in the manner provided by section 77-2615.01. For
each violation of subsection (4) of section 69-2706 or the rules and
regulations, the Tax Commissioner may also impose a civil penalty in an amount
not to exceed the greater of five hundred percent of the retail value of the
cigarettes or five thousand dollars upon a determination of violation of
subsection (4) of section 69-2706 or any rules or regulations adopted and
promulgated pursuant thereto. Such penalty shall be imposed in the manner
provided by section 77-2615.01.
(2) The license of a stamping agent shall be subject to termination if the
stamping agent:
(a) Fails to provide a report required under section 69-2708, 69-2710.01,
or 77-2604.01;
(b) Files an incomplete or inaccurate report required under section
69-2708, 69-2710.01, or 77-2604.01 or files an inaccurate certification
required under section 69-2708, subsection (2) of section 77-2603, or section
69-2710.01;
(c) Fails to pay taxes as provided in section 77-2602 or deposit escrow as
provided in section 69-2708.01;
(d) Sells cigarettes in or into the state in a package that bears a stamp
required under section 77-2603 or 77-2603.01 that is not the correct stamp and
provides for a lower level of tax than the correct stamp;
(e) Sells unstamped cigarettes in, into, or from the state or possesses
unstamped cigarettes in the state except as provided in section 77-2607;
(f) Purchases, sells in or into the state, or affixes a stamp to a package
containing cigarettes of a manufacturer or brand family that is not at the time
listed in the directory, or possesses such cigarettes more than ten days after
receiving notice that the manufacturer or brand family is not in the directory,
unless such stamping agent possesses a directory license under section 77-2603
or unless expressly permitted under sections 69-2701 to 69-2711 or sections
77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act; or
(g) Purchases or sells cigarettes in violation of subsection (5) of this
section or section 69-2710.02.
(3) In the case of a violation under subdivision (2)(a), (b), (c), or (d)
of this section that was not knowing or intentional, the stamping agent shall
be entitled to cure the violation within ten days after receipt of notice of
such violation. The license of a stamping agent that fully cures the violation
during that period shall not be terminated on account of that violation.
(4) In the case of a knowing or intentional violation under subdivision
(2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section, or of any violation described in
subdivision (2)(e) or (f) of this section, the stamping agent shall for a first
violation be subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars and be
guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and for a second or subsequent violation be
subject to a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars per violation and be
guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. In the case of violations described in
subdivision (2)(d), (e), or (f) of this section, each sale constitutes a
separate offense.
(5) The Tax Commissioner shall promptly remove any stamping agent whose
license is terminated from the list required by subsection (4) of section
-3-

LB9 LB9
2025 2025
77-2603 and shall publish a notice of the termination on the Tax Commissioner's
website and send notice of the termination to all stamping agents and to all
persons listed in the directory. Beginning ten days following the publication
and sending of such notice, no person may sell cigarettes to, or purchase
cigarettes from, the stamping agent whose license has been terminated.
(6) If a stamping agent whose license has been terminated is a tobacco
product manufacturer, the tobacco product manufacturer and its brand families
shall be removed from the directory.
(7) A stamping agent whose license is terminated shall be eligible for
reinstatement:
(a) Ninety days following the termination, in the case of a first failure
under subdivision (2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section that was not knowing
or intentional;
(b) One hundred eighty days following the termination, in the case of a
second failure under subdivision (2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section that
was not knowing or intentional;
(c) One year following the termination, in the case of a third or
subsequent failure under subdivision (2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section
that was not knowing or intentional;
(d) One year following the termination, in the case of a first knowing or
intentional failure under subdivision (2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section
or a first violation described in subdivision (2)(e), (f), or (g) of this
section; and
(e) Three years following the termination, in the case of a second or
subsequent knowing or intentional failure under subdivision (2)(a), (b), (c),
or (d) of this section or a second or subsequent violation described in
subdivision (2)(e), (f), or (g) of this section.
(8) Any cigarettes that have been sold, offered for sale, or possessed for
sale in this state in violation of subsection (4) of section 69-2706 shall be
deemed contraband under section 77-2620 and such cigarettes shall be subject to
seizure and forfeiture as provided in section 77-2620, except that all such
cigarettes so seized and forfeited shall be destroyed and not resold. The
stamping agent shall notify its customers for a brand family with regard to any
notice of removal of a tobacco product manufacturer or a brand family from the
directory and give its customers a seven-day period for the return of
cigarettes that become contraband.
(9) The Attorney General, on behalf of the Tax Commissioner, may seek an
injunction to restrain a threatened or actual violation of subsection (4) of
section 69-2706 or section 69-2708 by a stamping agent and to compel the
stamping agent to comply with subsection (4) of section 69-2706 or section
69-2708. In any action brought pursuant to this section, the state shall be
entitled to recover the costs of investigation, costs of the action, and
reasonable attorney's fees. This subsection shall not apply to a stamping agent
purchasing cigarettes which are not in violation of subsection (4) of section
69-2706 or section 69-2708.
(10) It is unlawful for a person to (a) sell or distribute cigarettes for
sale in this state or (b) acquire, hold, own, possess, transport, import, or
cause to be imported cigarettes that the person knows or should know are
intended for distribution or sale in the state in violation of subsection (4)
of section 69-2706. A violation of this subsection is a Class III misdemeanor.
(11) If a court determines that a person has violated any portion of
sections 69-2704 to 69-2711, the court shall order the payment of any profits,
gains, gross receipts, or other benefits from the violation to be remitted to
the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5,
of the Constitution of Nebraska. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the
remedies or penalties provided by sections 69-2704 to 69-2711 are cumulative to
each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all applicable laws
of this state.
(12) It is unlawful for any manufacturer, importer, or stamping agent to
knowingly submit any false information required pursuant to sections 69-2703 to
69-2711. A violation of this subsection is a Class IV felony. Knowing
submission of false information shall also be grounds for removal of a tobacco
product manufacturer from the directory.
(13) A tobacco product manufacturer that knowingly or intentionally sells
cigarettes in violation of subsection (5) of this section or section 69-2710.01
and its brand families shall be removed from the directory.
(14) A nonparticipating manufacturer whose total nationwide reported sales
on which federal excise tax is paid exceed the sum of its nationwide reports
under 15 U.S.C. 375 et seq. and any intrastate sales reports under 15 U.S.C.
375 et seq. by more than five percent of its total sales or one million
cigarettes, whichever is less, shall be subject to removal from the directory
unless it cures or satisfactorily explains the discrepancy within ten days
after receipt of notice of the discrepancy from the Attorney General pursuant
to section 69-2708.01.
(15) Any person that is not a stamping agent or tobacco product
manufacturer that fails to file a complete and accurate report required under
section 69-2708, 69-2710.01, 77-2604, or 77-2604.01 shall be entitled to cure
the failure within ten days after receipt of notice of the discrepancy from the
Attorney General pursuant to section 69-2708.01. If the person fails to fully
cure the failure within such period, it shall be subject to a civil penalty of
up to one thousand dollars per violation and shall be ineligible to hold any
license of the state regarding cigarette sales until the date specified by
subsection (7) of this section for violations of subdivision (2)(a) of this
-4-

LB9 LB9
2025 2025
section.
(16) A directory license shall be subject to termination if the licensee
acts inconsistently with its certification under subsection (2) of section
77-2603 or violates sections 69-2701 to 69-2711.
(17) Any person that knowingly or intentionally purchases or sells
cigarettes in violation of subsection (5) of this section or section 69-2710.01
or that knowingly or intentionally sells cigarettes in or into the state in a
package that bears a stamp required under section 77-2603 or 77-2603.01 that is
not the correct stamp and provides for a lower level of tax than the correct
stamp shall for a first violation be subject to a civil penalty of up to one
thousand dollars and be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and for a second or
subsequent violation be subject to a civil penalty of up to five thousand
dollars per violation and be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each sale
constitutes a separate violation.
Sec. 5. Section 69-2710.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
69-2710.01 (1) Any person that during a month acquired, purchased, sold,
possessed, transferred, transported, or caused to be transported in or into
this state cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family that
was not in the directory at the time shall, within fifteen days following the
end of that month, file a report in the manner prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner and certify to the state that the report is complete and accurate.
The report shall contain, in addition to any further information that the Tax
Commissioner may reasonably require to assist the Tax Commissioner in enforcing
sections 69-2701 to 69-2711 and 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act
and the Tobacco Products Tax Act, the following information:
(a) The total number of those cigarettes, in each case identifying by name
and number of cigarettes (i) the manufacturers of those cigarettes, (ii) the
brand families of those cigarettes, (iii) in the case of a sale or transfer,
the name and address of the recipient of those cigarettes, (iv) in the case of
an acquisition or purchase, the name and address of the seller or sender of
those cigarettes, and (v) the other states in whose directory the manufacturer
and brand family of those cigarettes were listed at the time and whose stamps
the person is authorized to affix; and
(b) In the case of acquisition, purchase, or possession, the details of
the person's subsequent sale or transfer of those cigarettes, identifying by
name and number of cigarettes (i) the brand families of those cigarettes, (ii)
the date of the sale or transfer, (iii) the name and address of the recipient,
(iv) the number of stamps of each other state that the person affixed to the
packages containing those cigarettes during that month, (v) the total number of
cigarettes contained in the packages to which it affixed each respective other
state's stamp, (vi) the manufacturers and brand families of the packages to
which it affixed each respective other state's stamp, and (vii) a certification
that it reported each sale or transfer to the taxing authority of the other
state by fifteen days following the end of the month in which the sale or
transfer was made and attaching a copy of all such reports. If the subsequent
sale or transfer is from this state into another state in packages not bearing
a stamp of the other state, the report shall also contain the information
described in subdivision (2)(c) of section 77-2604.01.
(2) Reports under this section shall be in addition to reports under
sections 69-2708, 77-2604, and 77-2604.01.
Sec. 6. (1) As soon as practicable after any return is filed, the Tax
Commissioner shall examine the return. If the commissioner, in his or her
judgment, finds that the return is incorrect and any amount of tax due from a
stamping agent, wholesale dealer, or retail dealer who is subject to sections
77-2601 to 77-2622 and this section is unpaid, the commissioner shall notify
such person of the deficiency. Such notice shall be delivered by mail or
personal service.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a notice of a
deficiency determination shall be personally served or mailed within three
years after the later of:
(a) The last day of the calendar month following the period for which the
amount is proposed to be determined; or
(b) The date the return was filed.
(3) In the case of a person failing to make a return, filing a false or
fraudulent return with the intent to evade sections 77-2601 to 77-2622 and this
section, or omitting from a return an amount properly includable therein which
is in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount of tax stated in the return,
a notice of a deficiency determination shall be personally served within six
years after the last day of the calendar month following the period for which
the amount is proposed to be determined.
(4) When, before the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for
the mailing of a notice of a deficiency determination, both the Tax
Commissioner and the person to be sent the notice have consented in writing to
its mailing after such time, the notice of the deficiency determination may be
mailed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The
agreed-upon period may be extended by subsequent agreement, in writing, made
before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.
Sec. 7. Section 77-2604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-2604 (1) Every stamping agent, wholesale dealer, and retail dealer who
is subject to sections 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act shall make
and file with the Tax Commissioner, on or before the fifteenth day of each
-5-

LB9 LB9
2025 2025
calendar month in the manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, true, correct,
and sworn reports covering, for the last preceding calendar month, the number
of cigarettes purchased, from whom purchased, the specific kinds and brands
thereof, the manufacturer, if known, and such other matters and in such detail
as the Tax Commissioner may require.
(2)(a) Each manufacturer and importer that sells cigarettes in or into the
state shall, within fifteen days following the end of each month, file a report
in the manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner and certify to the state that
the report is complete and accurate.
(b) The report shall contain the following information: The total number
of cigarettes sold by that manufacturer or importer in or into the state during
that month and identifying by name and number of cigarettes, (i) the
manufacturers of those cigarettes, (ii) the brand families of those cigarettes,
and (iii) the purchasers of those cigarettes. A manufacturer's or importer's
report shall include cigarettes sold in or into the state through its sales
entity affiliate.
(c) The requirements of this subsection shall be satisfied and no further
report shall be required under this section with respect to cigarettes if the
manufacturer or importer timely submits to the Tax Commissioner the report or
reports required to be submitted by it with respect to those cigarettes under
15 U.S.C. 376 to the Tax Commissioner and certifies to the state that the
reports are complete and accurate.
(d) Upon request by the Tax Commissioner, a manufacturer or importer shall
provide copies of all sales reports referenced in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b)
of this section that it filed in other states.
(e) Each manufacturer and importer that sells cigarettes in or into the
state shall either (i) submit its federal excise tax returns and all monthly
operational reports on Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau Form 5210.5 and
all adjustments, changes, and amendments to such reports to the Tax
Commissioner no later than sixty days after the close of the quarter in which
the returns were filed or (ii) submit to the United States Treasury a request
or consent under section 6103(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as
defined in section 49-801.01 authorizing the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax
and Trade Bureau and, in the case of a foreign manufacturer or importer, the
United States Customs Service to disclose the manufacturer's or importer's
federal returns to the Tax Commissioner as of sixty days after the close of the
quarter in which the returns were filed.
Sec. 8. Section 77-2612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-2612 The Tax Commissioner may employ, with the advice and consent of
the Governor, a sufficient number of inspectors, clerks, assistants, and agents
to enforce sections 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act, including the
collection of all stamp taxes and all revenue from cigarette tax meters. In
such enforcement, the Tax Commissioner may call to his or her aid the Attorney
General, any county attorney, any sheriff, any deputy sheriff, or any other
peace officer. The compensation of all persons employed shall be fixed by the
Governor and shall be paid from the revenue derived under such sections. The
expenses of administering such sections, including necessary assistants,
clerical help, cost of enforcement, cost of stamps, and incidental expenses,
when approved by the Tax Commissioner, shall be paid by warrants, issued
against the General Fund, but such warrants shall not exceed four percent of
the funds collected under such sections, such expenses in each instance to be
approved by the Tax Commissioner.
The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which
are consistent with sections 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act and
their proper enforcement.
Each stamping agent shall annually apply to the Tax Commissioner, upon
forms to be furnished by the Tax Commissioner, for a license to use the tax
meter machines, as set forth in section 77-2603, or to purchase such stamps as
provided in section 77-2608, or both. The license shall expire on December 31
each year. Each wholesale dealer applying for a stamping agent license shall
furnish with such application evidence satisfactory to the Tax Commissioner
showing that the wholesale dealer has obtained a license as a wholesale dealer
in accordance with section 28-1423. The applicant shall accompany the
application with a fee of five hundred dollars to be placed in the General Fund
if the license is granted and otherwise to be returned to the applicant. If the
applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's
social security number. If the application is approved and the bond referred to
in section 77-2603 is given and approved, if such bond is required under
section 77-2603, the Tax Commissioner shall issue such license which shall be
conspicuously posted in the place of business of such stamping agent.
Sec. 9. Section 77-2615.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2615.01 (1) In addition to sections 77-2615 and 77-2622, for any
violation of sections 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act or the rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated under such sections, the Tax
Commissioner may:
(a) After notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the licenses of any person
licensed under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 or 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6
of this act. Notice of hearing shall be given as provided in the Administrative
Procedure Act; and
(b) Impose an administrative penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars
for any violation.
-6-

LB9 LB9
2025 2025
(2) No person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall sell
cigarettes or permit cigarettes to be sold during the period of suspension or
revocation on the premises occupied by him or her. No disciplinary proceeding
or action shall be barred or abated by the expiration, transfer, surrender,
continuance, renewal, or extension of any license issued under sections 28-1420
to 28-1429 or 77-2601 to 77-2622 and section 6 of this act.
(3) Any person aggrieved by any decision, order, or finding of the Tax
Commissioner may appeal the decision, order, or finding, and the appeal shall
be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) If a person's license has been suspended or revoked and the person's
name has been removed for at least ten days from the list of licensed entities
published by the Tax Commissioner under subsection (4) of section 77-2603, any
person that sells cigarettes to or purchases cigarettes from such person shall
be jointly and severally liable for any taxes applicable to such cigarettes
under section 77-2602 and for any escrow due on such cigarettes under section
69-2703.
Sec. 10. Section 77-4001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-4001 Sections 77-4001 to 77-4025 and sections 12, 14, 17, and 19 of
this act shall be known and may be cited as the Tobacco Products Tax Act.
Sec. 11. Section 77-4002, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-4002 For purposes of the Tobacco Products Tax Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 77-4003 to 77-4007 and
sections 12 and 14 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 12. Alternative nicotine product has the same meaning as in section
28-1418.01.
Sec. 13. Section 77-4003.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-4003.01 Consumable material means any liquid solution or other material
containing nicotine or a nicotine analogue that is depleted as an electronic
nicotine delivery system is used.
Sec. 14. Nicotine analogue has the same meaning as in section 28-1418.01.
Sec. 15. Section 77-4007, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-4007 (1) Tobacco products means (a) shall mean (1) cigars, (b) (2)
cheroots, (c) (3) stogies, (d) (4) periques, (e) (5) granulated, plug cut,
crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking tobacco, (f) (6) snuff, (g) (7)
snuff flour, (h) (8) cavendish, (i) (9) plug and twist tobacco, (j) (10) fine
cut and other chewing tobacco, (k) (11) shorts, refuse scraps, clippings,
cuttings, and sweepings of tobacco, (l) (12) other kinds and forms of tobacco,
prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or smoking in a pipe or
otherwise or both for chewing and smoking, (m) any alternative nicotine
product, and (n) (13) electronic nicotine delivery systems.
(2) Tobacco , except that tobacco products does not include shall not mean
cigarettes as defined in section 77-2601.
Sec. 16. Section 77-4008, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-4008 (1)(a) A tax is hereby imposed upon the first owner of tobacco
products to be sold in this state.
(b) The tax on snuff shall be forty-four cents per ounce and a
proportionate tax at the like rate on all fractional parts of an ounce. Such
tax shall be computed based on the net weight as listed by the manufacturer.
(c) The tax on an electronic nicotine delivery system containing three
milliliters or less of consumable material shall be five cents per milliliter
of consumable material and a proportionate tax at the like rate on all
fractional parts of a milliliter.
(d) The tax on an electronic nicotine delivery system containing more than
three milliliters of consumable material shall be ten percent of (i) the
purchase price of such electronic nicotine delivery system paid by the first
owner or (ii) the price at which the first owner who made, manufactured, or
fabricated the electronic nicotine delivery system sells the item to others.
(e) For electronic nicotine delivery systems in the possession of retail
dealers for which tax has not been paid, the tax under this subsection shall be
imposed at the earliest time the retail dealer: (i) Brings or causes to be
brought into the state any electronic nicotine delivery system for sale; (ii)
makes, manufactures, or fabricates any electronic nicotine delivery system in
this state for sale in this state; or (iii) sells any electronic nicotine
delivery system to consumers within this state.
(f) The tax on alternative nicotine products shall be twenty percent of
(i) the purchase price of such products paid by the first owner or (ii) the
price at which a first owner who made, manufactured, or fabricated the product
sells the items to others.
(g) (f) The tax on tobacco products not otherwise provided for in this
section other than snuff and electronic nicotine delivery systems shall be
twenty percent of (i) the purchase price of such tobacco products paid by the
first owner or (ii) the price at which a first owner who made, manufactured, or
fabricated the tobacco product sells the items to others.
(h) (g) The tax on tobacco products shall be in addition to all other
taxes.
(2) Whenever any person who is licensed under section 77-4009 purchases
tobacco products from another person licensed under section 77-4009, the seller
shall be liable for the payment of the tax.
-7-

LB9 LB9
2025 2025
(3) Amounts collected pursuant to this section shall be used and
distributed pursuant to section 77-4025.
Sec. 17. (1) For any violation of the Tobacco Products Tax Act or the
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, the Tax
Commissioner may, in addition to any other penalty or sanction:
(a) After notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the licenses of any person
licensed under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429. Notice of hearing shall be given as
provided in the Administrative Procedure Act; and
(b) Impose an administrative penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars
for any violation.
(2) No person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall sell
tobacco products or permit tobacco products to be sold during the period of
suspension or revocation on the premises occupied by such person. No
disciplinary proceeding or action shall be barred or abated by the expiration,
transfer, surrender, continuance, renewal, or extension of any license issued
under the Tobacco Products Tax Act or sections 28-1420 to 28-1429.
(3) Any person aggrieved by any decision, order, or finding of the Tax
Commissioner may appeal the decision, order, or finding, and the appeal shall
be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 18. Section 77-4015, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-4015 (1) As soon as practicable after any return is filed, the Tax
Commissioner shall examine the return. If the Tax Commissioner, in his or her
judgment, finds that the return is incorrect and any amount of tax due from the
licensee is unpaid, he or she shall notify the licensee of the deficiency. Such
notice shall be delivered by mail or personal service mailed to the licensee.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a notice of a
deficiency determination shall be personally served or mailed within three
years after the later of:
(a) The last day of the calendar month following the period for which the
amount is proposed to be determined; or
(b) The date the return was filed.
(3) In the case of a person failing to make a return, filing a false or
fraudulent return with the intent to evade the Tobacco Products Tax Act, or
omitting from a return an amount properly includable therein which is in excess
of twenty-five percent of the amount of tax stated in the return, a notice of a
deficiency determination shall be personally served within six years after the
last day of the calendar month following the period for which the amount is
proposed to be determined.
(4) When, before the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for
the mailing of a notice of a deficiency determination, both the Tax
Commissioner and the person to be sent the notice have consented in writing to
its mailing after such time, the notice of the deficiency determination may be
mailed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The
agreed-upon period may be extended by subsequent agreement, in writing, made
before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.
Sec. 19. (1) Any tobacco products that have been sold, offered for sale,
or possessed for sale in this state in violation of the Tobacco Products Tax
Act are declared to be contraband goods and may be seized by the Tax
Commissioner, by the commissioner's agents or employees, or by any peace
officer of this state, when directed by the commissioner to do so, without a
warrant.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may, upon satisfactory proof, direct the return
of any confiscated tobacco products when the commissioner has reason to believe
that the owner thereof has not willfully or intentionally evaded any tax
imposed under section 77-4008.
(3) Any tobacco products forfeited to the state under this section shall
be destroyed or used for law enforcement purposes and then destroyed. The cost
of such seizure, forfeiture, and destruction shall be borne by the person from
whom the products are seized.
(4) The Tax Commissioner, agents and employees of the commissioner, and
any peace officer of this state, when acting pursuant to this section, shall
not in any way be responsible in any court for the seizure or the confiscation
of any tobacco products.
Sec. 20. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 21. Original sections 77-2604, 77-2612, 77-2615.01, and 77-4015,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 28-1418.01, 59-1523,
69-2705, 69-2709, 69-2710.01, 77-4001, 77-4002, 77-4003.01, 77-4007, and
77-4008, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-